Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.243, subdivision 3b, is amended to read: Subd. 3b. deleted text begin Nuclear power plant; new construction prohibited; relicensingdeleted text end new text begin Additional storage of spent nuclear fuelnew text end . deleted text begin (a) The commission may not issue a certificate of need for the construction of a new nuclear-powered electric generating plant. deleted text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end Any certificate of need for additional storage of spent nuclear fuel for a facility seeking a license extension shall address the impacts of continued operations over the period for which approval is sought. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end